ro-RO: Tipuri de ieșiri pentru amplificatorul de claviatură: Ieșire căști de 3,5 mm; Ieșire de linie de 6,35 mm (1/4 in); Buclă de efecte (send/return); Ieșire boxă externă; Ieșire de linie RCA; Ieșire subwoofer; USB audio; Ieșire DI XLR; Ieșire de linie XLR echilibrată; Altele
pt-BR: Amplificador de teclado tipos de saída: Saída para fone de ouvido de 3,5 mm; Saída de linha de 6,35 mm (1/4 pol.); Loop de efeitos (envio/retorno); Saída para alto-falante externo; Saída de linha RCA; Saída para subwoofer; Áudio USB; Saída DI XLR; Saída de linha balanceada XLR; Outros
cs: Typy výstupů zesilovače kláves: 3,5mm sluchátkový výstup; 6,35mm (1/4") linkový výstup; Efektová smyčka (send/return); Výstup pro externí reproduktor; Linkový výstup RCA; Výstup pro subwoofer; USB audio; Výstup XLR DI; Symetrický linkový výstup XLR; Jiné
hu: Billentyűzet erősítő kimeneti típusok: 3,5 mm-es fejhallgató-kimenet; 6,35 mm-es (1/4 colos) vonalkimenet; Effekthurok (send/return); Külső hangszóró-kimenet; RCA-vonalkimenet; Mélysugárzó-kimenet; USB-audio; XLR DI-kimenet; Szimmetrikus XLR-vonalkimenet; Egyéb
es: Salidas del amplificador de teclado: Salida para auriculares de 3,5 mm; Salida de línea de 6,35 mm (1/4 pulg.); Bucle de efectos (envío/retorno); Salida para altavoz externo; Salida de línea RCA; Salida para subwoofer; Audio USB; Salida DI XLR; Salida de línea balanceada XLR; Otra
ko: 키보드 앰프 출력 유형: 3.5mm 헤드폰 출력; 6.35mm(1/4인치) 라인 출력; 이펙트 루프(센드/리턴); 외부 스피커 출력; RCA 라인 출력; 서브우퍼 출력; USB 오디오; XLR DI 출력; XLR 밸런스드 라인 출력; 기타
th: ประเภทเอาต์พุตของแอมป์คีย์บอร์ด: ช่องเสียบหูฟัง 3.5 มม.; Line out ขนาด 6.35 มม. (1/4 นิ้ว); เอฟเฟกต์ลูป (ส่ง/กลับ); ช่องต่อลำโพงภายนอก; RCA line out; ช่องต่อซับวูฟเฟอร์; เครื่องเสียง USB; XLR DI out; XLR บาลานซ์ line out; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrste izlaza pojačala za klavijaturu: 3,5 mm izlaz za slušalice; 6,35 mm (1/4 inča) linijski izlaz; Petlja efekata (slanje/povrat); Izlaz za vanjski zvučnik; RCA linijski izlaz; Izlaz za subwoofer; USB audio; XLR DI izlaz; XLR balansirani linijski izlaz; Ostalo
en: Keyboard amplifier output types: 3.5 mm headphone out; 6.35 mm (1/4 in) line out; Effects loop (send/return); External speaker out; RCA line out; Subwoofer out; USB audio; XLR DI out; XLR balanced line out; Other
vi: Các loại đầu ra bộ khuếch đại bàn phím: Đầu ra tai nghe 3,5 mm; Đầu ra line 6,35 mm (1/4 in); Vòng hiệu ứng (gửi/trả); Đầu ra loa ngoài; Đầu ra line RCA; Đầu ra loa siêu trầm; Âm thanh USB; Đầu ra DI XLR; Đầu ra cân bằng line XLR; Khác
fi: Kosketinsoittimen vahvistimen lähtöjen tyypit: 3,5 mm:n kuulokelähtö; 6,35 mm:n (1/4 tuuman) linjalähtö; Efektisilmukka (lähetys/paluu); Ulkoisen kaiuttimen lähtö; RCA-linjalähtö; Subwoofer-lähtö; USB-ääni; XLR DI -lähtö; Tasapainotettu XLR-linjalähtö; Muu
bg-BG: Видове изходи за усилвател на клавиатура: 3,5 мм изход за слушалки; 6,35 мм (1/4 инча) линеен изход; Ефект лууп (send/return); Изход за външен високоговорител; RCA линеен изход; Изход за субуфер; USB аудио; XLR DI изход; XLR балансиран линеен изход; Друго
sv: Utgångstyper för tangentbordsförstärkare: 3,5 mm hörlursutgång; 6,35 mm (1/4 tum) linjeutgång; Effektloop (send/return); Extern högtalarutgång; RCA-linjeutgång; Subwoofer-utgång; USB-ljud; XLR DI-utgång; XLR balanserad linjeutgång; Övrigt
de: Ausgangstypen des Keyboardverstärkers: 3,5-mm-Kopfhörerausgang; 6,35-mm-Line-Out (1/4 Zoll); Effektweg (Send/Return); Ausgang für externen Lautsprecher; Cinch-Line-Out; Subwoofer-Ausgang; USB-Audio; XLR-DI-Ausgang; Symmetrischer XLR-Line-Out; Sonstige
nl: Keyboardversterker uitgangstypen: 3,5 mm koptelefoonuitgang; 6,35 mm (1/4 inch) lijnuitgang; Effect-loop (send/return); Uitgang voor externe speaker; RCA-lijnuitgang; Subwoofer-uitgang; USB-audio; XLR DI-uitgang; Gebalanceerde XLR-lijnuitgang; Anders
zh-CN: 键盘放大器输出类型: 3.5 毫米耳机输出接口; 6.35 毫米（1/4 英寸）线路输出接口; 效果器回路（发送/返回）; 外部扬声器输出接口; RCA 线路输出接口; 低音炮输出接口; USB 音频接口; XLR DI 输出接口; XLR 平衡线路输出接口; 其他
zh-TW: 鍵盤擴大機輸出類型: 3.5 公釐耳機輸出; 6.35 公釐 (1/4 吋) 線路輸出; 效果迴路 (Send/Return); 外接喇叭輸出; RCA Line Out; 重低音喇叭輸出; USB 音訊; XLR DI 輸出; XLR 平衡線路輸出; 其他
pl: Typy wyjść wzmacniacza klawiszowego: Wyjście słuchawkowe 3,5 mm; Wyjście liniowe 6,35 mm (1/4"); Pętla efektów (wysyłka/powrót); Wyjście na głośnik zewnętrzny; Wyjście liniowe RCA; Wyjście na subwoofer; Audio USB; Wyjście DI XLR; Zbalansowane wyjście liniowe XLR; Inne
tr: Klavye amplifikatörü çıkış türleri: 3,5 mm kulaklık çıkışı; 6,35 mm (1/4 inç) hat çıkışı; Efekt döngüsü (gönderim/dönüş); Harici hoparlör çıkışı; RCA hat çıkışı; Subwoofer çıkışı; USB ses; XLR DI çıkışı; XLR dengeli hat çıkışı; Diğer
el: Τύποι εξόδων ενισχυτή πλήκτρων: Έξοδος ακουστικών 3,5 mm; Έξοδος γραμμής 6,35 mm (1/4 in); Βρόχος εφέ (send/return); Έξοδος εξωτερικού ηχείου; Έξοδος γραμμής RCA; Έξοδος subwoofer; Ήχος USB; Έξοδος XLR DI; Συμμετρική έξοδος γραμμής XLR; Άλλο
ru: Типы выходов усилителя для клавишных: Выход для наушников 3,5 мм; Линейный выход 6,35 мм (1/4 дюйма); Петля эффектов (send/return); Выход на внешний динамик; Линейный выход RCA; Выход на сабвуфер; Аудио USB; Выход DI (XLR); Балансный линейный выход XLR; Другое
sl-SI: Vrste izhodov ojačevalnika za klaviature: 3,5 mm izhod za slušalke; 6,35 mm (1/4 in) linijski izhod; Zanka za efekte (send/return); Izhod za zunanji zvočnik; Linijski izhod RCA; Izhod za globokotonec; Zvok USB; Izhod XLR DI; Balansirani linijski izhod XLR; Drugo
sk-SK: Typy výstupov zosilňovača pre klávesy: 3,5 mm výstup na slúchadlá; 6,35 mm (1/4 palca) linkový výstup; Slučka efektov (odoslanie/návrat); Výstup na externý reproduktor; Linkový výstup RCA; Výstup na subwoofer; Zvuk USB; Výstup XLR DI; Symetrický linkový výstup XLR; Iné
it: Tipi di uscita dell'amplificatore per tastiera: Uscita cuffie da 3,5 mm; Uscita di linea da 6,35 mm (1/4 in); Loop effetti (send/return); Uscita cassa esterna; Uscita di linea RCA; Uscita subwoofer; Audio USB; Uscita DI XLR; Uscita di linea bilanciata XLR; Altro
da: Udgangstyper for tastaturforstærkere: 3,5 mm hovedtelefon ud; 6,35 mm (1/4 tomme) linje ud; Effekt-loop (send/return); Ekstern højttaler ud; RCA-linje ud; Subwoofer ud; USB-lyd; XLR DI ud; XLR-balanceret linje ud; Andet
lt-LT: Klavišinio stiprintuvo išvesties tipai: 3,5 mm ausinių išvestis; 6,35 mm (1/4 col.) linijinė išvestis; Efektų kilpa („Send / Return“); Išorinio garsiakalbio išvestis; RCA linijinė išvestis; Žemųjų dažnių garsiakalbio išvestis; USB garsas; XLR DI išvestis; XLR balansuota linijinė išvestis; Kita
ja: キーボードアンプの出力タイプ: 3.5 mm ヘッドホン出力; 6.35 mm (1/4 インチ) ライン出力; エフェクトループ (センド/リターン); 外部スピーカー出力; RCA ライン出力; サブウーファー出力; USB オーディオ; XLR DI 出力; XLR バランスライン出力; その他
pt-PT: Tipos de saída do amplificador de teclado: Saída de auscultadores de 3,5 mm; Saída de linha de 6,35 mm (1/4 pol.); Loop de efeitos (send/return); Saída de altifalante externo; Saída de linha RCA; Saída de subwoofer; Áudio USB; Saída DI XLR; Saída de linha balanceada XLR; Outro
fr: Types de sorties de l’amplificateur pour clavier: Sortie casque 3,5 mm; Sortie ligne 6,35 mm (1/4 po); Boucle d’effets (envoi/retour); Sortie haut-parleur externe; Sortie ligne RCA; Sortie caisson de basses; Audio USB; Sortie DI XLR; Sortie ligne symétrique XLR; Autre
nb: Utgangstyper for keyboardforsterker: 3,5 mm hodetelefonutgang; 6,35 mm (1/4 tommer) linjeutgang; Effektsløyfe (send/retur); Ekstern høyttalerutgang; RCA-linjeutgang; Subwooferutgang; USB-lyd; XLR DI-utgang; XLR balansert linjeutgang; Annet